Maine, session 132, LD1905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §8003, sub-§5-A, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 167, §§7 to
9, is further amended by amending subparagraph (6) to read:
(6) Delegate to staff the authority to review and approve applications for licensure
pursuant to procedures and criteria established by rule. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subparagraph are routine technical rules as described in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A; and
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §8003, sub-§5-A, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 167, §§7 to
9, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (6-A) to read:
(6-A) Delegate to staff the authority to determine if a pending complaint describes
a violation of law or rule that is not within the authority of the office, board or
commission to enforce; and
Page 1 - 132LR0630(03)